Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1018
Suppliers; disputes over rates; submission to board; hearing; recommendations.

In the event of any dispute between suppliers concerning rates for service between such suppliers which cannot be settled by negotiations, the dispute shall be submitted to the board. The board may intervene in any such dispute on its own motion. Upon the submission of such dispute or the board's decision to intervene, the board shall set a time and place for hearing thereon and give notice as provided in section 70-1013. Following such hearing the board shall make its recommendations for the settlement of such dispute, which recommendations shall be advisory only.

Laws 1963, c. 397, § 18, p. 1266.